Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska46-520
Protest petition; disqualification of signer.

Any person who signs a petition for creation of a district as the owner of any land shall be disqualified to sign a protest petition.

Laws 1947, c. 173, § 7(2), p. 529.